Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1001
Energy conservation and efficiency; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds, for purposes of sections 66-1001 to 66-1011, that:

(1) Our present dependence on foreign oil has created a danger to the public health and welfare and a need for a dependable source of energy;

(2) Conservation is one of the most prudent means of meeting our need for a dependable source of energy;

(3) There is an urgent and continuing need for every person and business in the state to conserve energy;

(4) There is an urgent and continuing need for capital to provide the initial investment necessary to make homes and other buildings more energy efficient;

(5) It would be prudent for our publicly owned electric utilities to supply this needed capital in order to avoid the greater costs of constructing new generation facilities; and

(6) Involvement by our publicly owned electric utilities in energy conservation programs serves a public purpose.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 14.